Massachusetts, session 194th, H744.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
There shall be a special commission established pursuant to section 2A of chapter 4 of
the General Laws to study and make recommendations on the quality of coaching staff at club
sports facilities, with a focus on ensuring proper training, vetting and reporting mechanisms for
coaches who work with children and young adults.
The commission shall consist of the following members: 3 members of the senate, 1 of
whom shall be appointed by the senate president, 1 of whom shall be appointed by the minority
leader and 1 of whom shall be appointed by the joint committee on education; 3 members of the
house of representatives, 1 of whom shall be appointed by the speaker of the house, 1 of whom
shall be appointed by the minority leader and 1 of whom shall be appointed by the joint
of 3

committee on education; the secretary of education or a designee; the commissioner of
elementary and secondary education or a designee; and 7 persons to be appointed by the
governor, 1 of whom shall be an expert in sports coaching and education, 1 of whom shall be an
expert in child development and psychology, 1 of whom shall be an expert in cultural diversity
and sensitivity, 1 of whom shall be a representative of a club sports facility that employs coaches
from foreign countries, 1 of whom shall be a representative of a club sports facility that employs
coaches from Massachusetts, 1 of whom shall be a representative of a parent advocacy group
concerned with the quality of coaching staff at club sports facilities, 1 of whom shall be a
representative of the Massachusetts Recreation and Parks Association and 1 of whom shall be a
representative of a student athlete who has participated in club sports.
The commission shall elect a chairperson from among its members. The commission may
hold public hearings and invite testimony from experts and the public. The commission may
request from any department, division, board, bureau, commission or agency of the
commonwealth such assistance and data as will enable it to properly carry out its duties.
The commission shall investigate and review: (i) the current hiring process and criteria
for coaches at club sports facilities; (ii) the best practices and guidelines for training coaches on
how to deal with children and young adults in various settings and situations; (iii) the potential
benefits and costs of implementing such practices and guidelines; (iv) the current reporting
program and procedures for parents and students who have complaints or concerns about
coaches at club sports facilities; (v) the creation of a state-wide licensing board to license,
prosecute and hold accountable club sports facilities for infractions of club sports facilities
licensure requirements and infractions of regulations, practices and guidelines set forth for the
hiring and oversight of club sports coaches; (vi) the best practices and guidelines for ensuring
of 3

accountability and transparency for coaches at club sports facilities; and (vii) any other matter
relevant to its charge.
The commission shall report its findings and recommendations, together with drafts of
legislation necessary to carry out such recommendations, to the clerks of the senate and house of
representatives, who shall forward copies thereof to the senate president, speaker of the house,
chairs of the joint committee on education and chairs of the senate and house committees on
ways and means not later than June 30, 2026.
of 3